apertium-ces-ces.ces_han.dix
    <pardef n="každ/ý__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ý<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nov/ý__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ějš</l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dialogov/ý__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__nov/ý"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ějš</l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chyt/rý__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ří</l>
        <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ří</l>
        <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>r</l>
        <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nové"/>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ro</l>
        <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>řějš</l>
        <r>rý<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="če/ský__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ští</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ští</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sk</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nové"/>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sko</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sky</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="po"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>štějš</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="něme/cký__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čtí</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čtí</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ck</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nové"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cko</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čtějš</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cky</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="po"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="evrop/ský__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ští</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ští</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sk</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nové"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sko</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>štějš</l>
        <r>ský<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="exotermi/cký__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čtí</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čtí</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ck</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nové"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cko</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>čtějš</l>
        <r>cký<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__další"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="novouč/ký__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cí</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cí</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nové"/> 
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ko</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="dim"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cel/ý__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ý<s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="PBASE__nové"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nej__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nej</l>
        <r>nej<s n="adv"/><j/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="novoučký"><p><l>novouč</l><r>nový</r></p><par n="novouč/ký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zlatý"><i>zlat</i><par n="cel/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aritmetický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>aritmeti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="asturijský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>asturij</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="balistický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>balisti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bilniuský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>bilniu</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="běloruský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>běloru</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="chronický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>chroni</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="chytrý"><par n="né__adv"/><i>chyt</i><par n="chyt/rý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dialogový"><par n="né__adv"/><i>dialogov</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zpětný"><par n="né__adv"/><i>zpětn</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="diamantový"><par n="né__adv"/><i>diamantov</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="drastický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>drasti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="egyptský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>egypt</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eskymácký"><par n="né__adv"/><i>eskymá</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fantastický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>fantasti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="fyziologický"><par n="né__adv"/><p><l>fysiologi</l><r>fyziologi</r></p><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gordický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>gordi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="grandslamový"><par n="né__adv"/><i>grandslamov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="guyanský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>guyan</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="identický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>identi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="islandský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>island</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kanonický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>kanoni</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="karakumský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>karakum</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="komorský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>komor</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="krizový"><par n="né__adv"/><i>krizov</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="krystalický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>krystali</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="královský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>králov</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kvantový"><par n="né__adv"/><i>kvantov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="libyjský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>libyj</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lovecký"><par n="né__adv"/><i>love</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="magnetofonový"><par n="né__adv"/><i>magnetofonov</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="manažerský"><par n="né__adv"/><p><l>manažér</l><r>manažer</r></p><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="marketingový"><par n="né__adv"/><i>marketingov</i><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="marketinkový" r="LR"><par n="né__adv"/><p><l>marketinkov</l><r>marketingov</r></p><par n="dialogov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mexický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>mexi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="múzický"><par n="né__adv"/><p><l>musi</l><r>múzi</r></p><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nantský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>nant</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neoblomný"><par n="né__adv"/><i>neoblomn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="německý"><par n="né__adv"/><i>něme</i><par n="něme/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ohleduplný"><par n="né__adv"/><i>ohledupln</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="organický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>organi</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="panamský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>panam</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="partyzánský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>partyzán</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="plechový"><par n="né__adv"/><i>plechov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pneumatický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>pneumati</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="podněsterský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>podněster</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="proletářský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>proletář</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="prostorový"><par n="né__adv"/><i>prostorov</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="přátelský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>přátel</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="půvabný"><par n="né__adv"/><i>půvabn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sinajský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>sinaj</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="slzavý"><par n="né__adv"/><i>slzav</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="statický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>stati</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="středoasijský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>středoasij</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svůdný"><par n="né__adv"/><i>svůdn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tchajwanský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>tchajwan</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="terapeutický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>terapeuti</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ukrajinský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>ukrajin</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="uspokojivý"><par n="né__adv"/><i>uspokojiv</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vegetariánský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>vegetarián</i><par n="evrop/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vulkanický"><par n="né__adv"/><i>vulkani</i><par n="exotermi/cký__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="víkendový"><par n="né__adv"/><i>víkendov</i><par n="cel/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="výnosný"><par n="né__adv"/><i>výnosn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zámožný"><par n="né__adv"/><i>zámožn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="šarlatánský"><par n="né__adv"/><i>šarlatán</i><par n="če/ský__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dokončený"><par n="né__adv"/><i>dokončen</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nabízený"><par n="né__adv"/><i>nabízen</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="oblečený"><par n="né__adv"/><i>oblečen</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="orientovaný"><par n="né__adv"/><i>orientovan</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="přijatý"><par n="né__adv"/><i>přijat</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="stvořený"><par n="né__adv"/><i>stvořen</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vyrytý"><par n="né__adv"/><i>vyryt</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zdaněný"><par n="né__adv"/><i>zdaněn</i><par n="nov/ý__adj"/></e>
